src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-lex_ceppi_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - čeppi: # 
    čeppi+A+Attr: čepis
    čeppi+A+Sg+Nom: čeppi
    čeppi+A+Sg+Gen: čeepi
    čeppi+A+Sg+Ill: čiäpán
    čeppi+A+Sg+Loc: čeepist
    čeppi+A+Sg+Com: čeppijn
    čeppi+A+Sg+Abe: čepittáá
    čeppi+A+Ess: čeppin
    čeppi+A+Par: čeppid
    čeppi+A+Pl+Nom: čeepih
    čeppi+A+Pl+Gen: [čepij, čeepij]
    čeppi+A+Pl+Acc: čeepijd
    čeppi+A+Pl+Ill: čeppijd
    čeppi+A+Pl+Loc: čeepijn
    čeppi+A+Pl+Com: [čepijguin, čepijgijn]
    čeppi+A+Pl+Abe: čepijttáá

    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: čeepib
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: čeepib
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: čepibân
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: čepibist
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: čepibáin
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: čeepibttáá
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: čepibin
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: čepibid
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: čepibeh
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: čepibij
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: čepibijd
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: čepibáid
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: čepibijn
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [čepibijguin, čepibijgijn]
    čeppi+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: čepibijttáá

    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: čepimus
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: čepimuu
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: čepimusân
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: čepimuust
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: čepimuin
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: čepimuuttáá
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: čepimussân
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: čepimussâd
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: čepimuuh
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: čepimui
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: čepimuid
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: čepimuid
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: čepimuin
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [čepimuiguin, čepimuigijn]
    čeppi+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: čepimuittáá
